District of Columbia statutes.
47-1081

KIPP DC — Douglass Property; Lot 950, Square 5872.

(a)

The real property located at 2600-2620 Douglas Road, S.E., and described as Lot 950, Square 5872, shall be exempt from real property taxation, including possessory interests, so long as the real property continues to be owned, or occupied under a ground lease, by KIPP DC or KIPP DC — Douglass QALICB, Inc.

(b)

Any transfer, assignment, or other disposition of all or any portion of the real property described in subsection (a) of this section, including an assignment of leasehold interest in the real property or a sublease of the real property, between KIPP DC and KIPP DC Douglass QALICB, Inc., shall be exempt from the tax imposed by § 42-1103 and § 47-903.

History

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-69, § 2(b), 56 DCR 6615
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 116, 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.

Temporary Legislation

Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 18-28 added § 47-1081 to read as follows:
“§ 47-1081. KIPP DC—Douglass Property; Lot 950, Square 5872.
“(a) The real property located at 2600-2620 Douglas Road, S.E., and described as Lot 950, Square 5872, shall be exempt from real property and possessory interest taxation so long as the real property continues to be owned or ground leased by KIPP DC or KIPP DC—Douglass QALICB, Inc.
“(b) Any transfer, assignment, or other disposition of all or any portion of the real property, including an assignment of a leasehold interest in the real property or a sublease of the real property, between KIPP DC and KIPP DC—Douglass QALICB, Inc., shall be exempt from recordation taxation pursuant to Chapter 11 of Title 42 and transfer taxation pursuant to Chapter 9 of this title.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-28 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of KIPP DC — Douglass Property Tax Exemption Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-42, April 24, 2009, 56 DCR 3564).